src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-Clex_tieda_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - tieđâ: # MLO, checked
    tieđâ+N+Sg+Nom: tieđâ
    tieđâ+N+Sg+Gen: tiettuu
    tieđâ+N+Sg+Ill: tiettui
    tieđâ+N+Sg+Loc: tiettust
    tieđâ+N+Sg+Com: tiettuin
    tieđâ+N+Sg+Abe: tiettuuttáá
    tieđâ+N+Ess: tieđân
    tieđâ+N+Par: tieđâd
    tieđâ+N+Pl+Nom: tiettuuh
    tieđâ+N+Pl+Gen: tiettui
    tieđâ+N+Pl+Acc: tiettuid
    tieđâ+N+Pl+Ill: tiettuid
    tieđâ+N+Pl+Loc: tiettuin
    tieđâ+N+Pl+Com: [tiettuiguin, tiettuigijn]
    tieđâ+N+Pl+Abe: tiettuittáá
